Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-38,101
(UTC 1012) Protection of person dealing with trustee.

(UTC 1012) (a) A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith assists a trustee, or who in good faith and for value deals with a trustee, without knowledge that the trustee is exceeding or improperly exercising the trustee's powers is protected from liability as if the trustee properly exercised the power.

(b) A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith deals with a trustee is not required to inquire into the extent of the trustee's powers or the propriety of their exercise.

(c) A person who in good faith delivers assets to a trustee need not ensure their proper application.

(d) A person other than a beneficiary who in good faith assists a former trustee, or who in good faith and for value deals with a former trustee, without knowledge that the trusteeship has terminated is protected from liability as if the former trustee were still a trustee.

(e) Comparable protective provisions of other laws relating to commercial transactions or transfer of securities by fiduciaries prevail over the protection provided by this section.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 101.

The trial court did not err in dismissing claims for a constructive trust against a purchaser, because the purchaser dealt in good faith with the trustees and had no reason to believe they participated in a breach of trust. Junker v. Carlson, 300 Neb. 423, 915 N.W.2d 542 (2018).